New York, session 2025-2026, S4774.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 125.13-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 125.13-a Vehicular homicide. 4 A person is guilty of vehicular homicide when such person, while oper- 5 ating a motor vehicle under circumstances evincing a depraved indiffer- 6 ence to human life, intentionally engages in conduct that causes the 7 death of another person. 8 Vehicular homicide is a class B felony. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 10 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07445-02-5